apertium-sme-smj.smj.dix
    <!-- Pronouns -->
    <pardef n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Attr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Attr"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Attr"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Attr"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Ess"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Ess"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ingen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Ess"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ada</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adak</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagá</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagi</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adaga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adakga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagága</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagiga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adage</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adak</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adakge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagáge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagák</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagige</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagik</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adakgen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagágen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagigen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jn</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jnga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jnge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jngen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isgen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ij</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijgen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ingen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>age</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ak</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>av</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Dem"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>

    <e lm="duohkkár"><i>duohkkár</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="diekkir"><i>diekkir</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dakkár"><i>dakkár</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="diekkár"><i>diekkár</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dåhkkár"><i>dåhkkár</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dáhkár"><i>dáhkár</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dákkir"><i>dákkir</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dåkkir"><i>dåkkir</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="diehkir"><i>diehkir</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dákkár"><i>dákkár</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="duohkkir"><i>duohkkir</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dahkkár"><i>dahkkár</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dáhkkár"><i>dáhkkár</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="diehkkir"><i>diehkkir</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="duohkár"><i>duohkár</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="duokkir"><i>duokkir</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dåhkir"><i>dåhkir</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dáhkkir"><i>dáhkkir</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dåhkkir"><i>dåhkkir</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dakkir"><i>dakkir</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dåhkár"><i>dåhkár</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dahkár"><i>dahkár</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dahkir"><i>dahkir</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dáhkir"><i>dáhkir</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="duohkir"><i>duohkir</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dåkkár"><i>dåkkár</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="diehkár"><i>diehkár</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="diehkkár"><i>diehkkár</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="duokkár"><i>duokkár</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
    <e lm="dahkkir"><i>dahkkir</i><par n="dåkkár__Pron_Dem"/></e>
